District of Columbia statutes.
38-151

Normal schools.

The Board of Education shall have power to make all necessary rules and regulations for the organization and government of the normal schools, to prescribe the course of study to be pursued therein, and to fix terms for the admission and graduation of pupils; provided, that the Board of Education is hereby authorized, under appropriations hereafter to be made, to expand the 2 existing normal schools into teachers’ colleges, and at the end of the 4th year thereof to award appropriate degrees.

Feb. 25, 1929, 45 Stat. 1276, ch. 314, § 1
Board of higher education, control of the District of Columbia Teachers College, see § 38-1103.
This section is referenced in § 38-1103.
1981 Ed., § 31-117.
1973 Ed., § 31-118.